Maryland, session 2025, SB1020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
2–1102.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1020*

SENATE BILL 1020
(a) In consultation with the Administration and as provided under this subtitle,
the Department shall establish by regulation and maintain a low emissions vehicle
program that:
(1) Is authorized by § 177 of the federal Clean Air Act; and
(2) Is applicable to vehicles of the 2011 model year and each model year
thereafter.
(b) As part of the program, the Department shall establish new motor vehicle
emissions standards and compliance requirements for each model year included in the
program as authorized by § 177 of the federal Clean Air Act.
2–1103.
(A) [To] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, TO minimize the
administrative impact of the program and to minimize the impact of motor vehicle
emissions generated out of state on the air quality of this State, the Department:
(1) May adopt California regulations, procedures, and certification data by
reference; and
(2) May work in cooperation with, and enter into contracts or agreements
with, California, other states, and the District of Columbia to administer certification,
in–use compliance, inspection, recall, and warranty requirements for the program.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ADOPT THE CALIFORNIA ADVANCED
CLEAN CARS II REGULATIONS TO BE EFFECTIVE BEFORE MOTOR VEHICLE MODEL
YEAR 2031.
2–1106.
(a) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE enforcement and penalty provisions of Subtitle 6 of this title shall apply
to a violation of this subtitle.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT APPLY THE ENFORCEMENT OR
PENALTY PROVISIONS OF SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS TITLE TO A MOTOR VEHICLE
MANUFACTURER FOR FAILING TO MEET THE MINIMUM ELECTRIC VEHICLE OR
PLUG–IN HYBRID ELECTRIC VEHICLE DELIVERY REQUIREMENTS UNDER THE
CALIFORNIA ADVANCED CLEAN CARS II PROGRAM FOR AN APPLICABLE MODEL
YEAR.
(b) Each transfer or attempted transfer of a motor vehicle or motor vehicle engine
in violation of § 2–1104(b) of this subtitle shall constitute a separate violation of the
provisions of this subtitle.

SENATE BILL 1020 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.